California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(d) A board member or their staff shall not use or threaten to use any official action or authority against, or attempt to interfere with, any person acting in good faith to report or otherwise provide information to MTA regarding any activity that may be a violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 10.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130620.

(a) Sanctions for violations of this chapter shall be determined by the board. The sanctions imposed shall depend upon the severity of the infraction and may be progressive unless the violation is determined to be so egregious as to warrant more severe action initially.

(b) The board may consult with the inspector general or the ethics officer for an opinion regarding the sanctions appropriate to any particular violation, provided that a release of confidential information is not required.

(c) Sanctions imposed under this section may include, but are not limited to, any of the
 following:

(1) Private reprimand by the board.

(2) Public censure by the board at a regularly scheduled meeting.

(3) Disqualification from participating in any discussion or vote on any matter related to the violation.

(4) Removal of the board member from one or more committees for a period of time.

(5) Permanent removal of the board member from one or more committees.

(6) Suspension from all board actions for a period of time.

(7) A monetary fine in an amount determined by the
 board.

(d) If a board member is criminally indicted, the board member shall be suspended from all board actions for the duration of the criminal proceeding. If the board member is acquitted of the charges, the board member shall return to the board as a full, participating member.

(e) For violations of this chapter that result in findings of criminal or civil liability, the board may recommend additional sanctions to the inspector general after the civil or criminal proceedings are completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 11.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130625.

(a) Confidential information, particularly investigative reports for the inspector general and procurement information, shall not be disclosed beyond the authorized recipient of the report or information.

(b) For purposes of this section, “confidential information” means information that is not subject to disclosure under applicable state law or MTA’s administrative code, or that is otherwise identified as confidential by MTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 12.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130630.

The role of the board as it relates to the MTA is as follows:

(a) The board provides counsel and direction to management and shall not be involved in the day-to-day affairs of the MTA.

(b) Board members do not have individual power or authority over the MTA. That power and decisionmaking authority lie with the full board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 175.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

130635.

The rules of conduct at board meetings shall be governed by the board’s adopted rules and procedures. Board members shall treat MTA employees and colleagues on the board with respect and courtesy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 13.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130640.

(a) Board members shall not engage in personal attacks on MTA employees or attempt to discipline any employee.

(b) Any concerns regarding an employee’s performance shall be communicated to the chief executive officer.

(c) Any concerns regarding the performance of an officer of the board shall be communicated to that officer.

(d) This section does not limit the right of the board to evaluate board officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 14.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130650.

Committee chairs shall present items from their committee meetings and the recommendation of their committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 900, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

130655.

(a) All board members shall be afforded an adequate opportunity to review written motions having financial or policy implications before the board meeting.

(b) A written motion having financial or policy implications shall be referred to the appropriate committee for recommendation to the full board, unless the motion is distributed to all board members not later than 48 hours before the board meeting or this requirement is waived by the vote of nine board members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 15.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130660.

(a) Board members or their staff are prohibited from soliciting or accepting any gift from a person or entity, including the person’s or entity’s lobbyists, that has submitted a proposal or bid for an MTA contract award during the period beginning on the date that the proposal or bid is submitted and ending 12 months after the final decision on the contract award.

(b) Board members and their staff shall exercise caution in accepting any gift
 from a person or entity that is considering submitting a proposal or bid for an MTA contract award.

(c) Board members shall not accept gifts aggregating more than ten dollars ($10) in a calendar month from a current MTA contractor, registered lobbyist, lobbying firm, or lobbyist employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 16.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130670.

The payment for, and reimbursement of, board travel shall be governed by applicable state law and MTA’s administrative code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 19.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130675.

(a) Board members shall not direct or request that any MTA employee, contractor, or proposer make a charitable contribution.

(b) (1) This section does not prohibit a board member from making a solicitation or request for a charitable contribution if a payment that is made in response to the solicitation or request by the board member would not be considered a behested payment, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 82004.5 of the Government Code and related regulations adopted by the Fair Political Practices Commission, if the payment was made at the behest of an elected officer.

(2) This section does not prohibit a board member from making a solicitation or request for a charitable contribution, including a solicitation or request by the board member that results in a reportable behested payment, if the solicitation or request is made to a person other than one identified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 20.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130680.

(a) The chief executive officer shall be responsible for ensuring the MTA has an independent professional procurement staff. The chief executive officer and designated procurement staff shall be responsible for conducting an independent, autonomous procurement process in accordance with state and federal law.

(b) Board members shall use objective judgment in voting on a procurement award and base their decision on the criteria established in the procurement documents.

(c) Board members or their staff shall not attempt to influence contract awards.

(d) During any procurement process, board members or their staff shall not communicate with MTA staff regarding the
 procurement unless authorized by this chapter, MTA’s administrative code, or MTA procurement policies.

(e) Before the staff recommendation for an award is made public, board members or their staff may communicate with the chief executive officer or the designee of the chief executive officer regarding the procurement, subject to limitations in this chapter, MTA’s administrative code, and MTA procurement policies. Board members and their staff may also communicate with the ethics officer for advice on compliance with this section.

(f) Board members or their staff shall not attempt to obtain or release information about the recommendation of the award of a contract until the recommendation is made public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 21.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130685.

(a) Commencing with the issuance of a request for proposal (RFP), request for interest in qualification (RFIQ), or invitation for bid (IFB), and ending on the date of the publicly released, recommended selection of the contractor, a person or entity submitting a proposal in response to the RFP, RFIQ, or IFB, or any officer, employee, representative, agent, or consultant representing the proposer or bidder, shall not contact by any means or engage in any discussion concerning the award of the contract with any board member or their staff. Any contact shall be grounds for the disqualification of the proposer or bidder.

(b) A board member who receives
 any communication from a proposer or bidder in violation of this chapter shall report that communication to the inspector general.

(c) During the period identified in this section, board members shall not communicate with a proposer or bidder or with any officer, employee, representative, or agent of the proposer or bidder regarding a contract award, protest, or any lawsuit or potential lawsuit regarding the contract award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 22.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130705.

(a) Board members or their staff shall not engage in any employment, activity, or enterprise that is inconsistent, incompatible, or in conflict with the duties of an MTA officer.

(b) Board members or their staff shall not use the MTA’s facilities, equipment, supplies, badge, prestige, or influence for personal gain.

(c) Board members and their staff shall refrain from conduct
 that is likely to create in the minds of reasonable observers the perception that the board member or staff member used their public position improperly.

(d) Board members or their staff shall not make, participate in, or attempt to influence any decision if they are incapable of providing fair treatment to a matter before the board due to bias, prejudice, or because they have prejudged a matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 25.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130710.

The MTA shall not contract with any of the following:

(a) Board members or their staff.

(b) Any profit-making firm or business in which a board member or member of their staff is an officer, principal, partner, or shareholder who owns more than 10 percent of the firm or business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 26.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130715.

(a) Former board members or their staff shall not participate in any contract with MTA for a period of 12 months after leaving the board.

(b) For a period of 12 months after the board member has left the board, MTA shall not contract with any profit-making firm or business in which the former board member or member of their staff is an officer, principal, partner, or shareholder who owns more than 10 percent of the firm or business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 27.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130720.

(a) Board members shall file Statements of Economic Interest with the ethics officer pursuant to state law, within 30 days of assuming office, annually, and within 30 days of leaving office.

(b) Any amendments to the Statement of Economic Interest shall be filed within 30 days of the occurrence of the change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 28.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130725.

Any person who receives compensation to regularly provide advice, recommendations, or counsel to board members regarding MTA activities shall file a Statement of Economic Interest with the MTA within 30 days of the commencement of the consultant relationship. This requirement does not apply to a full-time employee of a governmental entity who is already required to file Statements of Economic Interests with their employing agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 29.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130730.

(a) Any person who provides advice, recommendations, or counsel to board members regarding MTA activities and also advises another public or private entity that has a financial interest in an item before the board shall be prohibited from giving advice to board members and MTA staff regarding that item.

(b) This section shall not prohibit an employee of a public agency from providing advice or recommendations to a board member if the item affects their agency generally and does not involve any direct benefit to the public employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 30.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. San Bernardino County Transportation Authority Consolidation Act of 2017 [130800. - 130828.1.]

130800.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority Consolidation Act of 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130803.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Authority” means the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority established pursuant to Section 130806.

(b) “Local congestion management agency” means a County of San Bernardino congestion management agency established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 65089 of the Government Code.

(c) “Local transportation authority” means a County of San Bernardino transportation authority established pursuant to Section 180050.

(d) “San Bernardino Associated Governments” means the joint powers agency established pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(e) “San Bernardino County Consolidated Agencies” means the San Bernardino County Transportation Commission established pursuant to Section 130050, the local transportation authority, service authority for freeway emergencies, and local congestion management agency in existence on December 31, 2016, and the San Bernardino Associated Governments when it was acting on behalf of, or in the capacity of, those entities.

(f) “Service authority for freeway emergencies” means a County of San Bernardino service authority for freeway emergencies established
 pursuant to Section 2551 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130806.

There is hereby created the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority. The authority shall be the successor to the powers, duties, revenues, debts, obligations, liabilities, immunities, and exemptions, expressed or implied, of the San Bernardino County Consolidated Agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130807.

The San Bernardino County Transportation Commission shall be known as the authority.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 130054 by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 2.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130809.

(a) The authority may exercise all rights and powers, expressed or implied, including, without limitation, the power to issue bonds, and rely on any immunities or exemptions provided by law to a county transportation commission, a local transportation authority, a service authority for freeway emergencies, or a local congestion management agency.

(b) The authority’s powers include, but are not limited to, the power to do all of the following:

(1) To sue and to be sued.

(2) To acquire any property by any means, and to hold, manage, occupy,
 develop, jointly develop, dispose of, lease, convey, or otherwise encumber property.

(3) To create a leasehold interest in property for the benefit of the authority.

(4) To acquire, by eminent domain, any property necessary to carry out any of its powers or functions.

(5) To merge or split parcels, adjust boundary lines, or take similar actions as part of the acquisition of land or as needed in order to carry out its functions.

(6) To construct, acquire, develop, jointly develop, maintain, operate, lease, and dispose of work, property, rights-of-way, and facilities.

(7) To appoint necessary
 employees, including counsel, and to define their qualifications and duties.

(8) To enter into and perform all necessary contracts.

(9) To fix and collect fees for any services rendered by it.

(10) To adopt a seal and alter it.

(11) To adopt an annual budget and to fix the compensation of its officers, board members, and employees.

(12) To establish and enforce rules and regulations for the administration, operation, and maintenance of facilities and services.

(13) To enter into joint powers arrangements with other entities.

(14) To provide insurance.

(15) To issue bonds and incur other obligations.

(16) To advance funds from any sources towards a project in anticipation of future funding sources or contributions from other agencies in order to maximize the efficient delivery of projects undertaken by the authority.

(17) To loan moneys from any of the funds or accounts held by the authority to any other fund or account held by the authority, if all of the following occur:

(A) The loan is authorized pursuant to a resolution of the governing board of the authority.

(B) The authority determines that the loan serves the purposes of the authority.

(C) All moneys loaned to the borrowing fund or account are expended for any of the lawful purposes for which the borrowing account was established.

(18) To do any other things necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of a county transportation commission, a local transportation authority, a service authority for freeway emergencies, or a local congestion management agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130812.

The authority may bring an action to determine the validity of its bonds, warrants, contracts, obligations, or evidences of indebtedness issued on or after January 1, 2017, pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130815.

(a) The governing body of the authority shall consist of the following members:

(1) Five members of the San Bernardino County Board of Supervisors.

(2) One member from each County of San Bernardino incorporated city, who shall be a mayor or a city council member.

(3) One nonvoting member appointed by the Governor.

(b) Each County of San Bernardino incorporated city may appoint an alternate member to represent it at a meeting, but only if the regular member cannot attend the meeting.
 The alternate member shall either be a mayor or a city council member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130818.

(a) Any reference to the San Bernardino County Transportation Commission or to a County of San Bernardino transportation commission, local transportation authority, service authority for freeway emergencies, or local congestion management agency, shall be deemed to refer to the authority.

(b) By operation of law, the authority shall act as and assume the rights, obligations, assets, and liabilities of the San Bernardino County Consolidated Agencies, as established by operation of law or under any contract to which any of them is a party and that was entered into before January 1, 2017. All real and personal property owned by any of the San Bernardino County Consolidated Agencies
 shall be transferred to the authority by operation of law.

(c) The respective legally enforceable debts and liabilities of the San Bernardino County Consolidated Agencies shall transfer to the authority and exist as debts and liabilities of the authority in the same manner as if the authority had itself incurred them.

(d) The respective rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of the San Bernardino County Consolidated Agencies transferred to the authority, including, without limitation, any pledge of revenues or other collateral securing the repayment of bonds, as those terms are defined in Section 5450 of the Government Code, and the other responsibilities of the San Bernardino County Consolidated Agencies transferred to the authority, shall be preserved unimpaired, and
 those bonds are the valid obligations of the authority, in each case limited in lien or pledge to the property affected by the liens or pledges immediately prior to the transfer of related responsibilities and obligations.

(e) All powers, duties, debts, obligations, liabilities, or claims arising out of or related to the powers, duties, debts, obligations, and liabilities transferred to the authority under this chapter by operation of law shall be transferred to the authority without further recourse to the San Bernardino Associated Governments or its member agencies, as applicable, and the authority may be proceeded against or substituted in the place of any of the San Bernardino County Consolidated Agencies if the action or proceeding pertains to a transferred power, duty, revenue, debt, obligation, liability, or claim.

(f) In order to protect the holders of outstanding, unmatured bonds and other evidences of indebtedness of the San Bernardino County Consolidated Agencies pertaining to the responsibilities and obligations transferred to the authority, the authority shall have the power to take all actions and do all things necessary or required for the protection of those holders and for compliance with the terms of those bonds and other evidences of indebtedness. The authority shall have the power to continue all services that the San Bernardino County Consolidated Agencies, on the date of the transfer, was furnishing and that pertained to the responsibilities and obligations transferred to the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130821.

(a) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 180000), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 180200), and, except Section 180260, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 180250) of Division 19 (commencing with Section 180000) shall be equally applicable to the authority as if set forth herein and shall be in addition to the powers and functions of the authority set forth in this
 division.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 180260, all proceeds of the authority’s bonds shall be applied to secure the bonds or for the purposes for which the debt was incurred. However, when the purposes have been accomplished, any moneys remaining shall be either transferred to the fund used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds, or placed in a fund to be used for the purchase of the outstanding bonds in the open market at prices and in the manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as determined by the authority. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130824.

(a) After the creation of the authority and on the effective date of a resolution of the Board of Retirement of the San Bernardino County Employees’ Retirement Association consenting to membership of the authority’s employees pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 31557 of the Government Code, all then-current employees of the San Bernardino Associated Governments shall be deemed to be employees of the authority and all duties and obligations of the employment relationship shall be assumed by the authority. The status of each employee deemed to have become an employee of the authority by operation of this section, with respect to membership in the retirement system, shall, in all respects, be as if the employee had remained
 a member of the retirement system without any break in service or change of
 employer. The authority shall be deemed a “district” as defined by the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937 (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 31450) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 3 of the Government Code) and shall in all respects assume all of the rights, obligations, and status previously occupied by the San Bernardino Associated Governments as a participating district in the retirement system, including, but not limited to, the payment of employer contributions, the payment of unfunded actuarial liability, the withholding of employee contributions, the reporting of compensation earnable and pensionable compensation, record retention and audit compliance, the enrollment of eligible employees in membership, compliance with restrictions on the employment of retired persons, and the pickup of employee contributions pursuant to Section 414(h)(2) of the Internal
 Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. 414(h)(2)) and any agreement or resolution implementing the same.

(b) The termination of the San Bernardino Associated Governments’ status as a participating district in the retirement system shall not trigger withdrawal liability pursuant to Section 31564.2 of the Government Code. The authority shall assume the prior obligations of the San Bernardino Associated Governments for the payment of unfunded actuarial liability, which shall continue to be included in contribution rates calculated and approved pursuant to the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937, including, but not limited to, Sections 31453, 31453.5, 31454, 31581, and 31585 of the Government Code, as if no change in the participating employer had occurred.

(c) The authority shall succeed to the
 rights, duties, and obligations of the San Bernardino Associated Governments with respect to its replacement benefits program pursuant to Chapter 3.9 (commencing with Section 31899) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 3 of the Government Code. The rights of each retirement system member to participate in the replacement benefits program, as those rights exist at the time of the transfer of rights, duties, and obligations to the authority, whether the member is actively employed, deferred, or retired, shall continue as if there had been no change in the status of the employer. The transfer of rights, duties, and responsibilities shall not be deemed the creation of a new replacement benefit program, and the continuation of employees’ rights pursuant to the operation of this section shall not be deemed the offering of a new plan to any employee, for purposes of Section 7522.43 and subdivision (c) of
 Section 31899 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130827.

The authority shall have the power to contract to provide the services of its employees to San Bernardino Associated Governments upon lawful terms and conditions agreed to by the authority and San Bernardino Associated Governments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130828.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 130232, the authority, upon approval of the board of directors, may use the design-build contracting process described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code to award a contract for the construction of the Mt. Vernon Avenue Viaduct project in the City of San Bernardino.

(b) For purposes of this section, all references in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code to “local agency” shall mean the authority and its board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 154, Sec. 1.   (AB 1523)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

130828.1.

The following applies to Section 130828:

The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique and special circumstances surrounding the Mt. Vernon Avenue Viaduct project of the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority and the need to immediately, quickly, and efficiently develop the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 154, Sec. 2.   (AB 1523)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12.5. COUNTY TRAFFIC AND TRANSPORTATION FUNDING IN THE NINE-COUNTY SAN FRANCISCO BAY AREA [131000. - 131304.]



CHAPTER 1. Definitions and General Provisions [131000. - 131010.]

131000.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Bay Area County Traffic and Transportation Funding Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131001.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) That, in the nine-county San Francisco Bay area, traffic and transportation improvements are an immediate high priority needed to resolve the bay area’s serious traffic congestion and transit mobility problems that threaten the economic viability of the area and adversely impact the quality of life therein.

(b) That, in the nine-county San Francisco Bay area, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission is responsible for regional transportation planning and programming.

(c) That the commission and the counties and cities within the nine-county San Francisco Bay area wish to collectively develop and implement, on a county-by-county basis, near-term local traffic and transportation projects that responsibly and adequately deal with current and anticipated traffic congestion and transit mobility problems.

(d) That, in order to proceed in a expeditious manner with the development and implementation of those projects, each of the nine counties in the San Francisco Bay area should be provided the opportunity to review and determine whether there is a need for the development and implementation of a county transportation expenditure plan that goes significantly beyond current federal, state, and local funding.

(e) Therefore, it is in the public interest to allow the voters in any county in the nine-county San Francisco Bay area to either create a county transportation authority or to authorize the commission to implement a retail transactions and use tax for the purpose of funding a local transportation expenditure plan showing a need for the proceeds from that tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131002.

This division does not apply to the County of Santa Clara until November 1, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131003.

“City selection committee” means the committee created pursuant to Section 50270 of the Government Code. For purposes of the City and County of San Francisco, the committee means the Mayor of the City and County of San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131004.

“Commission” means the Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131005.

“County” includes a city and county, and means any of the nine San Francisco Bay area counties listed in Section 66502 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131006.

“Board of supervisors” means the board of supervisors of any of the nine San Francisco Bay area counties listed in Section 66502 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131007.

“County transportation authority” means any authority created pursuant to this division in any of the nine San Francisco Bay area counties listed in Section 66502 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131008.

“Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131009.

“Local governments” means the cities within each of the nine San Francisco Bay area counties listed in Section 66502 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131010.

“Sponsoring agency” means a governmental agency, including a county transportation authority, that has transportation responsibilities in the county in which a retail transactions and use tax ordinance has been approved pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. County Transportation Expenditure Plan [131050. - 131057.]

131050.

Any board of supervisors which believes its county has essential traffic and transportation projects for which current estimates of federal, state, and local funds may not be adequately available, may establish, on or after January 1, 1986, in conjunction with the city selection committee a process to develop a countywide consensus on the need for these projects and on a proposed county transportation expenditure plan to adequately fund the construction, maintenance, repair, or operation of these projects. The process may include the establishment of a committee or committees as the board of supervisors and the city selection
 committee deem necessary. The process shall provide for the participation of representatives of cities and the county, representatives of transit agencies serving the county, the department, the commission, and other agencies determined to be necessary by the board of supervisors and the city selection committee. Meetings of any committee established are subject to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The board of supervisors and the city selection committee may request the commission to provide some staffing assistance. The board of supervisors and the city selection committee shall establish, by resolution, an expected schedule and the process to be used for the completion of the tasks set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131051.

The county transportation expenditure plan shall consist of all of the following:

(a) (1) A list of essential traffic and transportation projects in the order of priority within the county, and their respective sponsoring agencies, which current estimates of federal, state, and local funds indicate are insufficient to provide for their completion. The types of projects may include, but are not limited to, capital, maintenance, repair, or operation projects. However, no project
 shall be included that does not have a sponsoring agency. Estimates of federal and state funding shall be based on estimates provided by the staff of the commission. The sponsoring agency shall provide cost estimates for its projects. An agency which administers a retail transactions and use tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this division shall not be a public transit operator. In addition, any state highway project is subject to approval by the department. Any project estimated to have adequate funding shall not be included on the list.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), funds generated from this division may be used to advance construction to an earlier date for projects contained in the state transportation improvement plan with the concurrence of the county transportation authority, the commission, the California Transportation Commission, and the department.

(b) An estimate
 of the costs of each of the projects listed in subdivision (a).

(c) An estimate of the current sources of funds available to assist in the completion of each of the projects listed in subdivision (a).

(d) An estimate of the additional amounts of funds to make up the difference between figures in subdivisions (b) and (c) for each of the projects listed in subdivision (a).

(e) A recommendation on whether the adoption of a retail transactions and use tax ordinance would be necessary to fund the projects listed in subdivision (a). If a recommendation is made for the adoption of that ordinance, it shall include a recommendation as to whether the tax shall be permanent or for a specific term. The recommendation shall also address the issue of whether a bonding authority should be sought and on the limitations of that
 authority.

(f) A recommendation on whether the board of supervisors should request the voters to authorize the creation of a county transportation authority pursuant to this division to impose and administer the proceeds of the tax ordinance recommended in subdivision (e), or whether the board of supervisors should request the commission to impose and administer the proceeds of the tax. The ordinance shall be subject to the approval of a majority of the electors voting on the measure to approve the imposition of the tax.

(g) If the recommendation is for the board of supervisors to ask the voters to request the commission to impose the tax, a recommendation shall be made for the establishment and membership of an advisory committee to advise the commission on the administration of the recommended county transportation expenditure plan.

(h) If the recommendation is for the creation of a county transportation authority, the recommendation shall also include the membership of the authority, specifying the number to represent local governments and the number to represent the county.
